Tennessee statutes. Title 9 Public Finances
Part 54

Block Grant Review Act of 1996

9-4-5401. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Block Grant Review Act of 1996.”

Acts 1996, ch. 1062, § 1; T.C.A. §9-6-401.

9-4-5402. Purpose.

The purpose of this part is to require state agencies to act with deliberate planning and with maximum feasible input of concerned citizens, religious congregations, nonprofit agencies and service providers and their clients/customers and board members and local government officials, in implementing reorganizations and new priority decisions related to receipt of federal block grants or other state decisions related to the devolution of policy and funding decisions from the federal government to the state.

Acts 1996, ch. 1062, § 2; T.C.A. §9-6-402.

9-4-5403. Considerations in block grants and federal devolution.

To the greatest extent practicable and as permitted by law, each state agency shall make block grant and federal devolution decisions based on the following principles:

Minimizing harmful impacts on current programs, current and potential recipients of assistance, local governments, nonprofit agencies and the state economy;

Ensuring formal and informal participation of concerned citizens, regulated industry or other entities, environmental groups, religious organizations, nonprofit agencies and service providers and their clients/customers and board members and local government officials in proposed reorganizations and new priority decisions, so that their experience may be used creatively by state decision makers; and

Providing the above-referenced groups and categories of citizens with full and prompt access to information on new policy and funding and program organization related to block grants and federal devolution of authority.

Acts 1996, ch. 1062, § 3; T.C.A. §9-6-403.

9-4-5404. Reporting requirements.

Each state agency responsible for making or recommending decisions on block grants and related topics shall issue a written report by February 1 each year to the finance, ways and means committee of the senate; and the finance, ways and means committee of the house of representatives; the health and welfare committee of the senate; the health committee of the house of representatives; the energy, agriculture and natural resources committee of the senate; the agriculture and natural resources committee of the house of representatives; the legislative office of budget analysis; and the governor. This report shall detail block grant and federal devolution decisions made or recommended by the agency and how those decisions made or recommended implement or fail to implement the principles outlined in §9-4-5403. Each agency that submits this report shall include in the report an executive summary of the major priority decisions and reorganizations related to receipt of the federal block grants or federal devolution decisions.

Acts 1996, ch. 1062, § 4; T.C.A. §9-6-404; Acts 2010, ch. 1030, § 10; 2011, ch. 410, § 3(b); 2012, ch. 604, § 8; 2013, ch. 236, § 83; 2016, ch. 797, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning the prohibition against establishment of a special committee if there is a standing committee on the same subject, please refer to Acts 2011, ch. 410.

9-4-5405. Compliance — Financial costs.

The head of each state agency shall be responsible for ensuring compliance with this part, with the financial costs of compliance being assumed by each state agency.

Acts 1996, ch. 1062, § 5; T.C.A. §9-6-405.